Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 5
CONSUMER INSURANCE
PREMIUM FINANCING

5-3-501. Scope.

The provisions of this part 5 apply to consumer insurance premium loans.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1224, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-7-101, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-502. Form of insurance premium loan agreement.

An agreement pursuant to which a consumer insurance premium loan is made shall contain the names of the insurance agent or broker negotiating each policy or contract and of the insurer issuing each policy or contract, the number and inception date of and premium for each policy or contract, the date on which the term of the loan begins, and a clear and conspicuous notice that each policy or contract may be canceled if payment is not made in accordance with the agreement. If a policy or contract has not been issued by the time the agreement is signed, the agreement may provide that the insurance agent or broker may insert the appropriate information in the agreement and, if he or she does so, shall furnish the information promptly in writing to the insured.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1224, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-7-102, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-503. Notice of cancellation.

If a default exists on a consumer insurance premium loan and any right to cure that exists has expired without cure being effected, the lender may give notice of cancellation of each insurance policy or contract to be canceled. If given, the notice of cancellation shall be in writing and given to the insurer who issued the policy or contract and to the insured. The insurer, within two business days after receipt of the notice of cancellation together with a copy of the insurance premium loan agreement if not previously given to the insurer, shall give any notice of cancellation required by the policy, contract, or law and, within ten business days after the effective date of the cancellation, pay to the lender any premium unearned on the policy or contract as of that effective date. Within ten business days after receipt of the unearned premium, the lender shall pay to the consumer indebted upon the insurance premium loan any excess of the unearned premium received over the amount owing by the consumer upon the insurance premium loan.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1224, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-7-103, as it existed prior to 2000.